California statutes. Water Code
The City of Oceanside shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by Senate Document Numbered 91-106, 91st Congress, Second Session, will be furnished by the city in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12749.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.7.

The City of Oceanside, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and project referred to in Section 12749.5 and may make modifications and amendments to the plan as may be necessary to execute them for the purpose of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12639).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 509, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.8.

The project for flood protection measures on the Guadalupe River in Santa Clara County is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the plans and subject to the conditions of the Report of the Board of Engineers for Rivers and Harbors dated June 29, 1986, as authorized by Section 401(b) of the Water Resources Development Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-662), at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. The department may pay 50 percent of the nonfederal capital costs of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features of
 the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 952, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.81.

The Santa Clara Valley Water District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that local cooperation required by the Report of the Board of Engineers for Rivers and Harbors dated June 29, 1986, will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12749.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 952, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.82.

The Santa Clara Valley Water District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and project referred to in Section 12749.8 and may make modifications and amendments to the plan as may be necessary to execute them for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 952, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.9.

The project for flood protection measures on Coyote/Berryessa Creeks in Santa Clara County is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers, in the report dated February 7, 1989, as transmitted to Congress on December 5, 1989, with recommendations of the Secretary of the Army, at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. Funds may be appropriated pursuant to this authorization only upon the act of Congress adopting and authorizing the project substantially in accordance with the Chief
 of Engineers report and recommendations of the Secretary of the Army. The department may pay 50 percent of the nonfederal capital costs of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 589, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.91.

The Santa Clara Valley Water District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that local cooperation required by the Water Resources Development Act of 1986 (P.L. 99-662) will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12749.9.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 589, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.92.

The Santa Clara Valley Water District in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and project referred to in Section 12749.9 and make modifications and amendments to the plan as may be necessary to execute them for the purpose of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 589, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.93.

(a) The Murrieta Creek Flood Control Project from Winchester Road downstream through the city of Temecula, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with Public Law 106-377, enacted on October 27, 2000, and Section 12585.7, at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated by the Legislature for state cooperation, upon the recommendation and advice of the department, and in accordance with Section 12847.

(b) The Riverside County Flood Control and
 Water Conservation District shall give assurances, satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army, that the local cooperation required by federal law will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in subdivision (a).

(c) The district, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall carry out the plans and project and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to carry out the plans for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter.

(d) The Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall enter into an agreement with the department pursuant to which the district agrees to indemnify and hold and save the state, its officers, agents, and employees harmless for any and all liability for damages that may arise out of the planning, design,
 construction, operation, maintenance, repair, and rehabilitation of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 730, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.94.

(a) The recreation and fish and wildlife features of the Murrieta Creek Flood Control Project from Winchester Road upstream through the City of Murrieta to Tenaja Road are adopted and authorized for state participation pursuant to Section 12847; however, the state shall not provide financial assistance for the flood control features of the upstream reach pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter.

(b) The Riverside County Flood Control and Water
 Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by federal law will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in subdivision (a).

(c) The district, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall carry out the plans and project and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to carry out the plans for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter.

(d) The Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall enter into an agreement with the department pursuant to which the district agrees to indemnify and hold and save the state, its officers, agents, and employees harmless for any and all liability for damages that may arise out of the planning, design, construction,
 operation, maintenance, repair, and rehabilitation of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 730, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.95.

(a) (1) The project for flood control on the Whitewater River in Riverside County is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the congressional approval and the final report of the Chief of Engineers dated December 29, 2000, as authorized by Section 101(b)(10) of the Water Resources Development Act of 2000 (Public Law 106-541), at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by statute, upon the recommendation and advice of the department.

(2) The authorization of the project is contingent upon the appropriation of funds in the annual Budget Act to pay for the state’s share of costs associated with the project.

(b) The Coachella Valley Water District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by that final report will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in subdivision (a).

(c) The Coachella Valley Water District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall carry out the plans and project and may make modifications and amendments to the plans for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with 12570) and this chapter.

(d) The Coachella Valley Water District shall
 enter into an agreement with the department pursuant to which the district agrees to indemnify and hold and save the state, its officers, agents, and employees harmless from any and all liability for damages that may arise out of the planning, design, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, and rehabilitation of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 637, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.97.

Notwithstanding Sections 12749.93 and 12749.94, it is the intent of the Legislature that no funds be appropriated for state cooperation in the Murrieta Creek Flood Control Project before July 1, 2013.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12749.95 (as added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 730) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 359.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.98.

(a) The state may provide subvention funds in accordance with Section 12585.7 to the County of Santa Barbara, or to local agencies in the county, for the project for flood damage reduction, Santa Barbara streams, Lower Mission Creek, California, authorized by Section 3034 of the Water Resources Development Act of 2007 (Public Law 110-114), that is substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of
 Engineers, as follows:

(1) At an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendations and advice of the department.

(2) Upon a specific written determination by the department that the project meets the requirements of Section 12582.7.

(b) The state assumes no liability for damages that may result from the project by either of the following:

(1) Authorizing the provision of subvention funds in accordance with this section.

(2) The appropriation by the Legislature of these subvention funds upon the recommendations and advice of the department.

(c) A
 county or local agency may receive the subvention funds only if it enters into an agreement with the department pursuant to which the county or local agency agrees to indemnify and hold and save harmless the state, its officers, agents, and employees for any and all liability for damages that may result from the project.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “liability for damages” includes, but is not limited to, liability for damages relating to the construction or operation of the project or the failure of the project to operate as intended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 195, Sec. 1.   (SB 619)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.99.

(a) The state may provide subvention funds in accordance with Section 12585.7 to the Santa Clara Valley Water District for the South San Francisco Bay Shoreline Project for flood control in areas along the south San Francisco Bay in the County of Santa Clara, that is authorized by Section 1401 of the federal Water Infrastructure Improvements for the Nation Act (Public Law 114-322) and that is substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers Report, dated December 18, 2015, as follows:

(1) At an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendations and advice of the department.

(2) Upon a specific written determination by the department that the project meets the requirements of Section 12582.7.

(b) The state assumes no liability for damages that may result from the project by either of the following:

(1) Authorizing the provision of subvention funds in accordance with this section.

(2) The appropriation by the Legislature of the subvention funds upon the recommendations and advice of the department.

(c) The
 Santa Clara Valley Water District may receive the subvention funds only if it enters into an agreement with the department pursuant to which the district agrees to indemnify and hold and save harmless the state, its officers, agents, and employees for any and all liability for damages that may result from the project, except for liability for damages resulting from activities the State Coastal Conservancy undertakes or manages, in whole or in part, for the project.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “liability for damages” includes, but is not limited to, liability for damages relating to the construction or operation of the project or the failure of the project to operate as intended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 685, Sec. 1.   (SB 881)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Small Flood Control Projects [12750. - 12751.]

12750.

Small flood control projects not specifically authorized by Congress undertaken by the United States Corps of Engineers pursuant to Section 205 of the Flood Control Act of 1948 (Public Law 858, Eightieth Congress, Second Session, approved June 30, 1948), as amended, are hereby adopted and authorized at such estimated costs as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 254.)
-------------------------------------------

12750.1.

The State shall pay the cost of lands, easements and rights-of-way for small flood control projects authorized by Section 12750 only if the department finds in its judgment that the benefits of the proposed works of improvement will exceed the costs thereof and that the project plan appears to be the most economical project plan, considering construction costs, lands, easements and rights-of-way costs, and costs of operation and maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2092.)
-------------------------------------------

12751.

Any county, city, state agency or public district affected by a small flood control project referred to in Section 12750 shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required for such projects by Section 205 of the Flood Control Act of 1948, as amended, will be furnished by such local agency. Such agency, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the project and may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 254.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Financing of Projects [12800. - 12832.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12800. - 12803.]

12800.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Flood Control Law of 1946.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

12801.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Public agency” means any state agency, county, city and county, city, or district of the State, except the department.

(b) “Flood control project” means any project heretofore or hereafter adopted and authorized by the Congress requiring local cooperation for flood control purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12802.

In pursuance of the policy declared in Chapters 1 and 2 of this part, the Legislature finds a state interest in assuming the cost of cooperation by the State with the United States in the construction of flood control projects to the extent provided in Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12803.

The Legislature intends that from time to time by law allocations from the General Fund for flood control projects will be made to pay for the cost of all lands, easements, and rights-of-way necessary for the construction of flood control projects adopted and authorized by the Legislature prior to March 12, 1946, and also those adopted and authorized on or after that date by the Congress of the United States, recommended by the department, and approved by the Legislature, in the order in which the Congress makes available funds for their construction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Extent and Method of Allocations [12825. - 12832.]

12825.

When the United States makes funds available on or after March 12, 1946, for the construction of any flood control project either adopted and authorized by Chapters 1 and 2 of this part or by subsequent legislation, any public agency affected may request the department to investigate and report to the Legislature as to the date state funds should be allocated to pay the cost of cooperation by the State with the United States for the project and the estimated amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12826.

(a) No money appropriated for flood control projects shall be allocated for the purchase of lands, easements, and rights-of-way necessary for multiple purpose dams or reservoirs constructed by the United States, and authorized by the Legislature prior to January 1, 1987, except the projects on the Fresno and Merced County Stream Groups.

(b) For projects involving dams or reservoirs authorized by the Legislature after January 1, 1987, the state shall pay for the costs of the flood control components of the project as specified in Section 12585.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1251, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12827.

As to projects other than those approved and authorized by the Legislature, the department shall make its determination in the manner provided by Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12828.

Except where the co-operation required by the United States in addition to the costs of all lands, easements, and rights-of-way, has been authorized to be assumed by the State prior to March 12, 1946, the department shall not reallocate the funds allocated to it, nor shall the Reclamation Board expend any funds appropriated directly to it, for acquisition of property rights or contributions to the United States, for any project for which the Reclamation Board is directed to give assurances to the United States unless and until a public agency other than the Reclamation Board has either assumed the obligations of maintenance and holding the United States harmless from damages due to the construction of works, directly with the United States, or has by binding agreement with the Reclamation Board agreed to assume such obligations and to hold the State and the Reclamation Board harmless from any claims therefor.

This section is not intended to prevent the expenditure of project funds by the Reclamation Board for planning and design engineering, title reports and appraisals, and other incidental expenses required in advance of actual acquisition of property rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 520.)
-------------------------------------------

12829.

Money allocated to the department for flood control projects shall be reallocated to public agencies upon order of the department after application therefor has been made to it by such agencies showing the necessity, purpose and use to be made of the money or by the showing that such agencies have made necessary advances or incurred obligations for the purpose of expediting projects for which the allocation is made and giving such other information as the department may require. Expenditures of the reallocated sums shall be reported to the department as and when required by it. The reports shall give such information as it may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

12830.

The department may refuse to make any order for the reallocation of any of the funds if the provisions of this chapter are violated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 230.7.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12831.

The department shall submit to the Controller all approved local agency claims for reimbursement allocations for flood control projects within 90 days of receipt of the claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1378, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12832.

The Controller shall perform an audit of projects completed pursuant to this chapter within nine months after the claim is received by the department. If the Controller is unable to perform the audit within nine months after the claim is submitted by a local agency, the department shall pay at least 90 percent of the claim subject to completion of the audit by the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1378, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Fish, Wildlife, and Recreation in Connection With Flood Control and Watershed Protection Projects [12840. - 12849.]



  ARTICLE 1. State Policy [12840. - 12842.]

12840.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12639) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12800), the policy set forth in this chapter shall apply to watershed protection and flood prevention projects under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12850), to small watershed projects approved by the State Conservationist of the United States Department of Agriculture, to small flood control projects authorized by Section 12750, and to flood control projects authorized by Congress and adopted and authorized by the Legislature pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12639). It is not the intent of this chapter to affect the responsibility for the maintenance and operation of those projects pursuant to the applicable provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1251, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

12841.

The Legislature finds and declares that in order to protect the general health and welfare of the public it is necessary to provide for the preservation and enhancement of the state’s fish and wildlife resources in connection with flood control and watershed protection projects and to realize the full potential of such projects to provide recreational opportunities to the general public.

The Legislature further finds and declares that in order to enhance the general public health and welfare it is necessary that all flood control and watershed protection projects be designed, constructed, and operated so as to realize their full potential for the enhancement of the state’s fish and wildlife resources and to provide recreational opportunities to the general public. The Legislature further finds and declares that the realization of fish and wildlife enhancement opportunities and the provision of recreational opportunities is of benefit to all of the people of California and that a portion of the costs of realizing these benefits from federal flood control and watershed protection projects should be borne by them.

The Legislature further finds and declares that fish and wildlife enhancement and recreational development should be among the purposes of all federal flood control and watershed protection projects and that opportunities to attain these benefits should be realized concurrently with the realization of benefits from other project purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------

12842.

The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the intent of the Legislature that the planning and construction of all flood control and watershed protection projects shall include such features as may be determined to be necessary and desirable to preserve and enhance the state’s fish and wildlife resources and to achieve the full utilization of such projects for recreational purposes consistent with the construction and operation of such projects to protect life and property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Responsibilities of State Agencies [12843. - 12846.]

12843.

In order to achieve the goals set forth in this chapter, all state agencies exercising resource management responsibilities shall review reconnaissance and feasibility reports submitted for state review and comment by federal agencies relating to any project or project feature affecting their responsibilities and shall submit their comments in accordance with the requirements of federal and state law and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------

12844.

In order to guide state agencies in their review of proposed flood control and watershed protection projects, it is the intent of the Legislature that recreational purposes shall include, but be not limited to, those recreational activities normally and usually associated with the out-of-doors which make project land and water areas available for use by the general public and are consistent with the operation of the project for other purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------

12845.

In order to realize the full potential of such projects for fish and wildlife enhancement and for recreational development, state agencies having resource management responsibilities affected by the project are authorized to cooperate with federal and local sponsoring agencies through all stages of the project formulation and planning process, and to develop such data as, in their judgment, may be necessary to carry out the intent and purpose of this chapter. Such physical features as may be necessary to permit full public utilization of the completed project for recreational purposes shall be constructed and such lands as may be necessary for recreational purposes and for fish and wildlife enhancement shall be acquired at the same time and in the same manner as lands for other project purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------

12846.

The Department of Fish and Game shall be responsible for the management of all fish and wildlife resources at any project subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 920.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. State Financial Assistance [12847. - 12848.]

12847.

Where recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features are contained in a flood control or watershed protection project, and where such payment is specifically authorized by the Legislature, the state shall pay 50 percent of the nonfederal capital costs of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features of the project; provided, however, if the project is subject to the provisions of Public Law 89-72, the state may cooperate in the attainment of such benefits in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 5094.3 of the Public Resources Code.

The department or the Reclamation Board, as to projects under their respective jurisdictions, shall obtain assurances from the local agency sponsoring the project guaranteeing public access to project land and water areas prior to state participation in any costs pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------

12848.

The Legislature hereby declares that there shall be included in the budget of the department for flood control subventions or for direct acquisitions by the state for each fiscal year an appropriation of funds from the General Fund in an amount sufficient to pay all costs required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of Local Agencies [12849. - 12849.]

12849.

Any local agency sponsoring a project subject to the provisions of this chapter is hereby authorized to design, construct, operate, and maintain public recreational facilities at such project and shall have such powers as may be necessary or convenient to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Local sponsoring agencies are authorized to contract with the United States, the State of California, and with other local agencies or entities in order to realize the full potential of flood control and watershed protection projects for recreational development and for fish and wildlife enhancement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Watershed Protection Flood Prevention Projects [12850. - 12875.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [12850. - 12850.]

12850.

Chapter 4 of this part shall be known and may be cited as “The California Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1886.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [12851. - 12854.]

12851.

The definitions in this article govern the contruction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1886.)
-------------------------------------------

12853.

“Lands, easements and rights of way” includes lands and rights or interests in lands whereon channel improvements and channel rectifications, debris dams and water retarding structures are located; lands, rights, or interests in lands necessary in connection with the construction, operation, or maintenance of such channel improvements and rectifications, debris dams and water retarding structures, including those necessary for flooding and flowage purposes, debris basins, spoil areas, borrow pits, or for access roads; and including the cost of the relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of existing improvements, structures, or utilities rendered necessary by such channel improvements and rectifications, debris dams and water retarding structures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1886.)
-------------------------------------------

12854.

“Local organizations” means any county, city, state agency or public district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1886.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Declaration of Policy [12860. - 12861.]

12860.

It is hereby declared that the people of the State have a primary interest in the control and conservation of floodwaters and the prevention of erosion, sediment damages and other damages by floodwaters in the watersheds of the rivers and streams of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1886.)
-------------------------------------------

12861.

It is hereby declared that recurrent floods on rivers and streams of this State, causing loss of life and damage to property, disruption of commerce, interruption of transportation and communications, and wasting of water, are detrimental to the peace, health, safety and welfare of the people of the State. The control and prevention of such floods and the loss and damage caused thereby and the conservation and protection of the State’s land and water resources are proper functions and activities of the State, in cooperation with counties, cities, state agencies and public districts, and in cooperation with the United States, or any of its departments or agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1886.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Declaration of Intent [12865. - 12868.]

12865.

It is the intention of the Legislature that it will be the policy of the State to pay the costs of local cooperation required by acts of Congress for the following types of watershed projects:

(a) “Pilot plant” or “experimental projects” in this State, whether commenced prior to the effective date of this chapter or not, authorized by the Department of Agriculture Appropriation Act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1954 (Chapter 251, Public Law 156, Eighty-third Congress, First Session, approved July 28, 1953) to be carried out pursuant to Public Law 46, Seventy-fourth Congress. 

(b) Any project in this State undertaken, whether prior to the effective date of this chapter or not, pursuant to the Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Act (Public Law 566, Chapter 656, Eighty-third Congress, Second Session).

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1886.)
-------------------------------------------

12866.

The costs of local cooperation which the State will assume pursuant to Section 12865 shall be limited to the costs of lands, easements and rights of way.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1886.)
-------------------------------------------

12866.1.

It is also declared to be the policy of the state that the state shall not provide financial assistance for relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of existing improvements, structures, or utilities for which the owner has no legal right to be compensated for such relocation, reconstruction or replacement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 893.)
-------------------------------------------

12866.2.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the following policy shall apply to projects approved by the appropriate committees of the Congress and by the Department of Agriculture after November 10, 1969:

(a) The state shall pay 75 percent of the costs of lands and rights or interests in lands whereon channel improvements and channel rectifications, debris dams and water-retarding structures are located and of lands, rights, or interests in lands necessary in connection with the construction, operation, or maintenance of such channel improvements and rectifications, debris dams and water-retarding structures, including those necessary for flowage purposes, spoil areas, borrow pits, or for access roads, apportioned to the benefits resulting from the reduction of flood damage.

(b) The local agency shall pay 25 percent of the costs of lands and rights or interests in lands whereon channel improvements and channel rectifications, debris dams and water-retarding structures are located and of lands, rights, or interests in lands necessary in connection with the construction, operation, or maintenance of such channel improvements or rectifications, debris dams and water-retarding structures, including those necessary for flowage purposes, spoil areas, borrow pits, or for access roads, apportioned to the benefits resulting from the reduction of flood damage and all of such costs apportioned to the benefits resulting from increased or higher utilization of land.

(c) The state shall pay 90 percent of the costs of the relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of existing improvements, structures, or utilities rendered necessary by the project, apportioned to the benefits resulting from the reduction of flood damage.

(d) The local agency shall pay 10 percent of the costs of the relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of existing improvements, structures, or utilities rendered necessary by the project, apportioned to the benefits resulting from the reduction of flood damage and all of such costs apportioned to the benefits resulting from increased or higher utilization of land.

(e) The state’s portion of the costs under subdivisions (a) and (c) shall be determined by the department at or prior to the time the report recommending federal authorization is submitted to the Congress. In the case of projects already having federal authorization, the state’s portion of such costs shall be determined by the department at the time state authorization is sought by the local agency. The state’s portion shall not be changed unless there are major project changes made in the plan of improvement, in which case the department, prior to the next appropriation of state funds for the project, shall review the project and make such new determinations as it deems justified by the project changes.

(f) When a project approved prior to November 10, 1969, is so modified that it becomes subject to the provisions of Section 12873, the policy described in this section shall be applied to any portion of the modified project which the department determines to be beyond the scope of the originally authorized project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1054.)
-------------------------------------------

12866.3.

The local agency may receive credit against its share of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way as determined in subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 12866.2 for lands required for the project which were acquired not more than five years prior to federal authorization of the project. The amount of this credit shall be determined by the department by applying the percentage representing the state portion of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way as determined in subdivision (a) of Section 12866.2 to the actual costs of the local agency in the case of acquisition by purchase or condemnation, and to the fair market value at the time the title is transferred in the case of acquisition free of charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1054.)
-------------------------------------------

12866.4.

Whenever specifically authorized by the Legislature, the department may lend the local agency the funds necessary to pay the local portion of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way determined in subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 12866.2, less any credit for previously acquired lands determined under Section 12866.3. The state loan may not exceed a period of 10 years and the rate of interest on the loan shall be the current rate for the state’s Pooled Money Investment Account. The loan shall be repaid in annual installments beginning one year after the loan is made. The annual loan payment shall be deducted from the state’s annual tax subvention to the local agency, if any. In the event that the local agency does not receive tax subventions from the state adequate to make the loan payment and becomes in default of the loan payments, the local agency, notwithstanding any other provisions of any statute limiting its tax ceiling, shall levy sufficient taxes to repay the loan. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any local agency authorized to participate in the construction of watershed protection projects is authorized to accept the loans authorized pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1054.)
-------------------------------------------

12867.

The State shall pay the costs of lands, easements and rights of way for projects described in subsection (a) of Section 12865 only if, or to the extent that:

(a) The Secretary of Agriculture and local organizations have agreed on a plan for works of improvement pursuant to the authorization made by the Department of Agriculture Appropriation Act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1954.

(b) Local organizations have given assurances as required by the Secretary of Agriculture relative to local participation.
